Hawaii statutes.
[§432C-3] Approval process. (a) No
nonprofit entity may engage in a conversion without prior approval of the
application for conversion by the commissioner. Any conversion without the
commissioner's approval shall be voidable by the commissioner.

(b) Prior to approval of the conversion plan,
the commissioner shall determine the fair market value of the assets of the
nonprofit entity and shall ensure that the assets of the nonprofit entity are
transferred to another nonprofit entity at the time of conversion pursuant to
section [432C-5].

(c) After reviewing the report and plan for
conversion of the nonprofit entity, if the commissioner finds any discrepancy
in the valuation of the assets of the nonprofit entity, the commissioner may
obtain an independent party to provide a valuation of the assets. The
commissioner shall have the discretion of making a final determination of the
valuation of the assets of the nonprofit entity; provided that any issues
arising from valuation are brought forth during the public hearing.

(d) A public hearing shall be conducted
pursuant to chapter 91 prior to approving or disapproving the conversion.
Prior to approving or disapproving the conversion, the commissioner may
investigate and consider any matter or issue raised at the public hearing.

(e) Within sixty days after the public
hearing, the commissioner shall disapprove or approve the conversion or approve
an amended conversion plan; provided that the commissioner may extend this
period if the commissioner deems more time is needed to resolve any issues
brought forth during the public hearing or upon mutual consent of the nonprofit
entity and the commissioner.

(f) The commissioner shall approve the
conversion if the commissioner finds all of the following have been met:

(1) The conversion plan is in compliance with section
432C-2;

(2) The plan is fair and reasonable and not contrary
to law or to the interests of subscribers, contract holders, and the residents
of the State; and

(3) Upon conversion, the for-profit corporation will
meet the standards and conditions applicable to stock insurance companies,
including minimum surplus requirements.

(g) The commissioner shall issue an order
approving or disapproving the conversion or approving an amended conversion plan.
[L 1998, c 260, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next